Utah statutes.
31A-30-202.6.   Dental and vision plans on the defined contribution arrangement market.

(1)  Beginning January 1, 2014, a carrier may offer dental and vision plans in the defined contribution arrangement market.

(2) (a)  A carrier that offers a dental or vision plan in the defined contribution arrangement market is not required to offer the same dental or vision plans outside the defined contribution arrangement market and does not have to use the same rating and underwriting practices in and out of the defined contribution arrangement market.

(b)  If a carrier offers a dental or vision plan in the defined contribution arrangement market, the carrier shall allow an employee of a small employer group to enroll in a dental and vision plan in accordance with Subsection (3).

(3) (a)  A small employer group shall participate in a defined contribution arrangement and meet participation requirements for the defined contribution arrangement before the employer may elect to offer its employees dental or vision plans under Subsection (3)(b).

(b)  A small employer who meets the requirements of Subsection (3)(a) may elect to offer its employees:

(i)  a dental plan offered in the defined contribution arrangement market;

(ii)  a vision plan offered in the defined contribution arrangement market; or

(iii)  both a vision plan and a dental plan offered in the defined contribution arrangement market.

(4)  An employee whose employer has offered its employees a defined contribution medical plan and met participation requirements under Subsection (3)(a) may elect to enroll, or not enroll, in the dental and vision plan selected by the employer.

(5)  An employer's small group must meet participation requirements established by the commissioner by administrative rule for each dental or vision plan selected by an employer under Subsection (3).



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

